Wyoming statutes. Title 16 City, County, State and Local Powers
Article 2. Telecommunications for the Communications Impaired

Legislative findings. —

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 2, provides:

“(a)

The Wyoming legislature supports the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990 with regard to the need to provide telecommunications access to all of our citizens.

“(b)

The legislature finds and declares that many of our citizens are communications impaired and are unable to use traditional telecommunications equipment and services without assistance. These citizens constitute a substantial and valuable resource within the United States and the state of Wyoming and this segment of our population needs access to telecommunications services in order to function as contributing and productive members of our society.

“(c)

The legislature further finds and declares that the role of telecommunications in our world today is inestimable. Telecommunications in necessary for the health, safety and well-being of our citizenry, as well as being the primary vehicle of commerce and industry, the means to convey and receive information and knowledge, and the way to connect with others on a personal as well as business level.

“(d)

The legislature further finds that access to telecommunications services must be provided to persons who are communications impaired not only for their own sake, but for the benefit of society at large. Access to telecommunications services will enhance the personal and business lives of communications impaired persons and its availability to these persons will be an investment of benefit to all of Wyoming.

“(e)

Consistent with the findings stated in this section, the legislature finds it appropriate to provide communications impaired persons access to telecommunications services by creating a program to make specialized telecommunications equipment and message relay services available in the state of Wyoming.”

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is individual regarded as having, or perceived to have, impairment within meaning of Americans with Disabilities Act (42 U.S.C.A. § 12102(2)(c)), 148 ALR Fed 305.

§ 16-9-201.
Definitions.

As used in this act, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

“Access line” means the facility that allows the customer of a local exchange company or radio communications service provider to access the local or toll network with the exception of dedicated facilities such as a private line;

“Committee” means the committee on telecommunications services for the communications impaired established by W.S.

16-9-202

;

“Communications impaired” means hearing impaired or speech impaired individuals as defined by the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, Title IV, Section 401;

“Division” means the division of vocational rehabilitation within the department of workforce services;

“Local exchange company” means a telecommunications company that provides telephone access lines to members of the general public who are its customers;

“Message relay system” means a statewide service through which a communications impaired person, using specialized telecommunications equipment, may send and receive messages to and from a noncommunications impaired person whose telephone is not equipped with specialized telecommunications equipment and through which a noncommunications impaired person may, by using voice communication, send and receive messages to and from a communications impaired person;

“Program” means the program established by W.S.

16-9-205

;

“Radio communications service provider” means a telecommunications company that provides radio communication service, radio paging or cellular service to members of the general public who are its customers;

“Specialized telecommunications equipment” means a device that, when connected to a telephone, enables or assists a person who is communications impaired to communicate with another person utilizing the telephone network. The term most commonly refers, but is not limited to, telecommunications devices for the deaf (TDDs);

“This act” means W.S.

16-9-201

through

16-9-210

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Americans With Disabilities Act. —

The relevant portions of section 401 of the federal Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, referred to in subsection (a)(iii), appear as 47 U.S.C. § 225.

Cited

in

Qwest Corp. v. State, 2006 WY 35, 130 P.3d 507,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Wyo. Mar. 22, 2006).

§ 16-9-202.
Committee on telecommunications services for the communications impaired; composition; allocation.

There is created a committee on telecommunications services for the communications impaired.

The committee shall consist of seven (7) members. The membership shall be appointed by the governor and shall consist of one (1) member from each appointment district as provided by W.S.

9-1-218

.

The committee is allocated to the division for administrative purposes.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1; 2016 ch. 119, § 1, effective July 1, 2016.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (b), deleted the former last sentence, which read, “Not more than four (4) members shall be of the same political party.”

Laws 2016, ch. 119 § 3, provides: “Nothing in this act shall be deemed to affect the current term of any member of any authority, board, commission, committee or council. The governor shall make appointments in accordance with this act for any vacancy occurring on or after the effective date of this act.”

§ 16-9-203.
Term of office; vacancies; officers; bylaws; compensation; conflict of interest.

Each member of the committee shall serve a term of three (3) years, except that the governor shall appoint two (2) of the initial members to serve terms of one (1) year and two (2) of the initial members to serve terms of two (2) years.

A vacancy on the committee shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.

The committee shall choose a chairperson from among its members.

The committee shall establish its own operating procedures.

Members of the committee shall receive no compensation, but shall be reimbursed under W.S.

9-3-102

and

9-3-103

for travel and per diem expenses incurred in the performance of their duties.

In order to avoid a potential conflict of interest, members of the committee representing a potential provider of the message relay system or specialized telecommunications equipment shall abstain from any vote or decision of the committee regarding the award of contracts for those services or equipment by the division.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1.

The 2006 amendment

deleted “those member defined in W.S. 16-9-202(b)(i) and (ii)” following “compensation, but” in (e).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 16-9-204.
Power and duties of the committee.

The committee shall advise the division as to the administration of the program provided for in W.S.

16-9-205

. In fulfilling this duty, the committee shall:

Review and recommend policies and procedures governing administration of the program and ensure the program is in compliance with any applicable state and federal laws or regulations;

Assist the state in obtaining certification from the federal communications commission that the program is in compliance with such rules and regulations;

Review the division’s budget request for administration of services under the program;

Monitor the expenditures of funds for the program;

Monitor the quality of the program and the satisfaction of the users;

Perform any other duties necessary to properly advise the division as to the administration of the program.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 16-9-205.
Program established; purpose; responsibilities of the division of vocational rehabilitation.

The division in consultation with the committee, shall establish and administer a program to provide specialized telecommunications equipment and message relay services to persons who are communications impaired. The purpose of the program shall be to:

Furnish specialized telecommunications equipment to meet the needs of persons who are communications impaired and who might be otherwise disadvantaged in their ability to obtain such equipment; and

Provide a message relay system to allow persons who are communications impaired to communicate via the telecommunications network with noncommunications impaired persons.

In carrying out its responsibilities, the division shall:

Develop rules, policies and procedures, as may be necessary, to govern administration of the program and ensure the program is in compliance with any applicable state and federal laws or regulations;

As part of its request for proposals, include provision for an equipment distribution program and utilize a preexisting state agency means test, if available, to determine eligibility for participation in the specialized telecommunications equipment program;

Implement the message relay system as described in subsection (a)(ii) of this section within one (1) year following the effective date of this act and, to the extent funds generated by the special fee specified in W.S.

16-9-209

are available, implement the specialized telecommunications equipment distribution program described in subsection (a)(i) of this section within two (2) years following the effective date of this act;

Perform any other duties necessary to properly oversee administration of the program.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-9-201(a)(x).

§ 16-9-206.
Message relay system; requirements.

The division, after consultation with the committee, shall contract with a qualified provider to design and implement a message relay system that fulfills the purpose described in W.S.

16-9-205

. The division shall award the contract for this service to the provider based upon price, the interests of the communications impaired community in having access to a high-quality and technologically advanced telecommunications system, and all other factors listed in the committee’s request for proposal including proposals for a specialized telecommunications equipment distribution program.

Except in cases of willful misconduct, gross negligence or bad faith, neither the committee nor the provider of the message relay system, nor the employees of the provider of the message relay system, shall be liable for any claims, actions, damages or causes of action arising out of or resulting from the establishment, participation in, or operation of the message relay system.

The division shall require, under the terms of the contract, that:

The system be available statewide for operation seven (7) days a week, twenty-four (24) hours per day, including holidays, for both interstate and intrastate calls;

The system relay all messages promptly and accurately;

The system maintain the privacy of persons using the system;

The provider preserve the confidentiality of all telephone communications; and

The system conform to any standards established by applicable state or federal laws or regulations.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1.

§ 16-9-207.
Gifts and grants.

The committee may accept contributions, gifts and grants, in money or otherwise, to the program established in W.S.

16-9-205

. Monetary contributions, gifts and grants must be deposited in the fund created by W.S.

16-9-208

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1.

§ 16-9-208.
Account for telecommunications services for the communications impaired.

There is created an account for telecommunications services for the communications impaired. The account shall consist of:

All monetary contributions, gifts and grants received by the committee as provided in W.S.

16-9-207

; and

All special fee charges billed and collected pursuant to W.S.

16-9-209

.

The money in the account is appropriated to the division to implement this act.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, in (a), deleted “in the earmarked revenue fund” following “communications impaired.”

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-9-201(a)(x).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 16-9-209.
Special fee.

The committee shall annually determine the amount of a special fee, not to exceed twenty-five cents ($.25) per access line per month, based upon available cost data and other information, that will cover the costs of providing intrastate message relay service as provided in Section 401 of the Americans With Disabilities Act of 1990, including the cost of implementing and administering this act. Funding for the interstate portion of the Wyoming relay system shall be provided in a manner consistent with rules and orders adopted by the federal communications commission in implementing the Americans With Disabilities Act.

The committee shall notify the public service commission, in writing, of the amount of the monthly access line special fee determined by the committee. The public service commission shall provide for the inclusion and identification of the special fee on each monthly billing for service from each local exchange company and radio communications service provider.

Each customer of a local exchange company or radio communications service provider shall be liable for payment to the local exchange company or radio communications service provider of any special fee imposed pursuant to this act. In the case of a customer of a radio communications service provider, any fee imposed by this act shall be imposed only if the customer’s place of primary use is in this state as provided by the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. §§ 116 through 126. The provisions of the Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act shall apply to this subsection. The local exchange company or radio communications service provider shall not be liable for any uncollected charge, nor shall the company have an obligation to take any legal action to enforce the collection of any charge that is unpaid by its customers.

No customer of a local exchange company shall be required to pay the special fee on more than one hundred (100) access lines per account and no customer of a radio communications service provider shall be required to pay the special fee on more than one hundred (100) radio communication service numbers per account in Wyoming.

Except as provided in subsection (g) of this section, all special fees billed and collected by a local exchange company or radio communications service provider shall be transmitted to the public service commission not later than the last day of the month following the end of the month in which the special fee is collected. All special fees received by the public service commission shall be deposited in the account established by W.S.

16-9-208

with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer.

All special fees billed and collected by a local exchange company or radio communications service provider shall not be considered revenues of the local exchange company or radio communications service provider and are not subject to tax under W.S.

39-15-101

through

39-16-311

.

Each local exchange company or radio communications service provider may deduct and retain one percent (1%) of the total charges billed and collected each month to cover administrative expenses in complying with the requirements of subsections (b) through (e) of this section.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1; 1998, ch. 5, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 46, § 1; 2015 ch. 12, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (e), substituted “public service commission” for “state treasurer” twice, and added “with receipt and acknowledgement submitted to the state treasurer”at the end.

Americans With Disabilities Act. —

The federal Americans With Disabilities Act, referred to in the second sentence in subsection (a), appears mainly as 42 U.S.C. §§ 12101 through 12213. The relevant portions of section 401 of the act, referred to in the first sentence in subsection (a), appear as 47 U.S.C. § 225.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 16-9-201(a)(x).

§ 16-9-210.
Records; audit.

Each local exchange company or radio communications service provider shall maintain a record of the special fees billed and collected pursuant to W.S.

16-9-209

for a period of three (3) years from the date of billing or collection, respectively.

The committee may require an audit, at division expense, of the records of each local exchange company or radio communications service provider to assure proper accounting of all special fees billed and collected pursuant to W.S.

16-9-209

.

History.

Laws 1991, ch. 170, § 1.